Arkansas, session 2025, HB1849.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 12, Chapter 6, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 9 — Tribal Lands

12-16-901. Cross deputization.
(a) A municipality, a county, or the state may enter into an agreement
with a tribal nation having federally-recognized tribal land within the
borders of the state for the cross deputization of law enforcement agencies.
(b) An agreement under subsection (a) of this section may allow
municipal, county, state law and tribal law enforcement agencies to have
authority to enforce tribal, state, and local laws within the borders of the
state on federally-recognized tribal land and surrounding jurisdictions.


*CEB236*
03/18/2025 3:24:55 PM CEB236